District of Columbia statutes.
47-1812.10

Repealed

Period of limitation upon assessment and collection.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 354, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 10
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 132, ch. 146, title IV, § 417
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-21, § 2, 26 DCR 386
June 11, 1982, D.C. Law 4-118, § 117, 29 DCR 1770
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(l)(4), 34 DCR 5097
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 103(b), 43 DCR 4569
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1601, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(n), 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-265, § 4, 46 DCR 2096
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(z)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1812.10.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586i.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”